Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1328
Retirement benefits; declared additional to benefits under federal Social Security Act.

The retirement allowances and benefits shall be in addition to benefits and allowances payable under the provisions of the federal Social Security Act.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 28, p. 1677.

For other provisions relating to social security, see Chapter 68, article 6.